District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.53

Use of funds resulting from closure.

(a)

Funds resulting from the closure of a capital project pursuant to § 50-921.52(a) shall be allocated to restore funding to the Vision Zero Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety Fund, established by § 50-921.20, up to an annual level of $1.5 million and then equally among the Local Streets Ward-based capital projects; provided, that funds specific to non-participating costs shall be allocated to the non-participating Highway Trust Fund Support project.

(b)

Funds resulting from the closure of capital projects pursuant to § 50-921.52(b) shall be allocated to the Federal Highway Administration capital projects approved for the current fiscal year as part of that year’s Budget Request Act.

History

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11j [11k]
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 9002, 59 DCR 8025
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 8012, 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6033(b), 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote (a).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “the Vision Zero Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety Fund, established by § 50-921.20” for “the Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety Enhancement Fund, established by § 1-325.131” in (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8012 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8012 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8012 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6033(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).